Washington statutes.
RCW 33.32.070

Failure to comply with title as disqualifying act.

Any foreign savings and loan association or like corporation doing business in this state which fails to comply with any provision of this title as required shall not thereafter transact any business within this state.

[ 1982 c 3 s 61; 1945 c 235 s 86; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-205. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 89; 1913 c 110 s 21; 1890 p 56 ss 14, 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.